Utah statutes.
16-6a-1415.   Procedure for judicial dissolution.

(1) (a)  A proceeding by the attorney general or director of the division to dissolve a nonprofit corporation shall be brought in:

(i)  the district court of the county in this state where the nonprofit corporation's principal office is located; or

(ii)  if the nonprofit corporation has no principal office in this state, in the district court in and for Salt Lake County.

(b)  A proceeding brought by a party that is not listed in Subsection (1)(a) but is named in Section 16-6a-1414 shall be brought in:

(i)  the district court of the county in this state where the nonprofit corporation's principal office is located; or

(ii)  if it has no principal office in this state, in the district court of Salt Lake County.

(2)  It is not necessary to make directors or members parties to a proceeding to dissolve a nonprofit corporation unless relief is sought against the directors or members individually.

(3)  A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a nonprofit corporation may:

(a)  issue injunctions;

(b)  appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court directs; or

(c)  take other action required to preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the activities of the nonprofit corporation until a full hearing can be held.

